North Dakota, session 69, HB1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 21-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
21-03-11. Elections - When and how called and held.
1. Upon or after the adoption of an initial resolution by the governing body, or at the first meeting
of the governing body held after the filing of a petition and proposed initial resolution by the
qualified electors as specified in subsection 2 of section 21-03-10, the governing body by
resolution shall provide for submittingsubmit the initial resolution to the qualified electors of the
municipality the question whether the initial resolution shall be approvedfor approval.
2. The date of the election must be notmay not be less than twenty sixty - four days after the
passage of the initial resolution by the governing body or in the filing date of a sufficient
petition therefor by thefiled by the qualified electors of the municipality.
3. The governing body shall designate the date of the election, the polling hours, and polling
place, which must be the same as for municipal elections therein, andheld within the
municipality. The governing body shall appoint an inspector, two judges, and two clerks of
election for each polling place. In case of the absence of any election official, or the official's
inability to act at the opening of the polls,
4. If an election official is absent or unable to serve as an election official when a polling place is
open, the remaining election officials for the polling place shall appoint a qualified elector to fill
the vacancy. The election must be conducted and the election returns thereofmust be made
and canvassed as in the case ofin the same manner of elections of members of the governing
body of the municipality.

H. B. NO. 1138 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1138.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State